Illinois, session 104th, SB942.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 13/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the P-20 8Longitudinal Education Data System Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-107, eff. 7-30-09.)